Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 3 Abandoned Vessels

52-7-70.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Abandoned vessel” means a vessel:

Which has been left by the owner or some person acting for the owner with a vessel dealer, repairman, or wrecker service for repair or for some other reason and has not been called for by such owner or other person within a period of 30 days after the time agreed upon; or within 30 days after such vessel is turned over to such dealer, repairman, or wrecker service when no time is agreed upon; or within 30 days after the completion of necessary repairs;

Which is left unattended upon or in any public water or at any port in this state without the consent of the agency having jurisdiction or docked at any private property without the consent of the owner of such property for a period of at least five days and when it reasonably appears to a law enforcement officer that the individual who left such vessel unattended does not intend to return and remove such vessel;

Which has been lawfully towed onto the property of another at the request of a law enforcement officer and left there for a period of not less than 30 days without anyone’s having made claim thereto;

Which has been lawfully towed onto the property of another at the request of a property owner on whose property the vessel was abandoned and left there for a period of not less than 30 days without the owner’s having made claim thereto; or

Which has been left unattended on private property for a period of not less than 30 days without anyone’s having made claim thereto.

“Owner” means the owner, lessor, lessee, security interest holders, and all lienholders as shown on the records of the Department of Natural Resources.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water and specifically includes, but is not limited to, inflatable rafts.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1.

52-7-71.
Removal and storage of vessels; procedure.

Any person who removes a vessel from public property or public water at the request of a law enforcement officer or stores such vessel shall, if the owner of the vessel is unknown, seek the identity of and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel from the law enforcement officer requesting removal of such vessel or such officer’s agency within 72 hours of removal.

Any person who removes a vessel from private property or private waters at the request of the property owner or stores such vessel shall, if the owner of the vessel is unknown, notify in writing a local law enforcement agency of the location of the vessel, the vessel certificate of number, and the hull identification number, model, year, and make of the vessel, if known or if readily ascertainable, within 72 hours of the removal of such vessel and shall seek from the local law enforcement agency the identity and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel and any information indicating that such vessel is a stolen vessel.

If any vessel removed under conditions set forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section is determined to be a stolen vessel, the local law enforcement officer or agency shall notify the Georgia Crime Information Center and the owner, if known, of the location of such vessel within 72 hours after receiving notice that such vessel is a stolen vessel.

If any vessel removed under conditions set forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section is determined not to be a stolen vessel or is not a vessel being repaired by a repair facility or is not being stored by an insurance company providing insurance to cover damages to the vessel, the person removing or storing such vessel shall, within seven calendar days of the day such vessel was removed, notify the owner, if known, by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery of the location of such vessel, the fees connected with removal and storage of such vessel, and the fact that such vessel will be deemed abandoned under this article unless the owner redeems such vessel within 30 days of the date such vessel was removed.

If the person identified as the owner fails to redeem such vessel as described in subsection (d) of this Code section, or if a vessel being repaired by a repair facility or being stored by an insurance company providing insurance to cover damages to the vessel becomes abandoned, the person removing or storing such vessel shall, within seven calendar days of the day such vessel became an abandoned vessel, give notice in writing, by sworn statement, to the Department of Natural Resources stating the vessel certificate of number, the hull identification number, the fact that such vessel is an abandoned vessel, the model, year, and make of the vessel, if known or if readily ascertainable, the date the vessel became an abandoned vessel, the date the vessel was removed, and the present location of such vessel and requesting the name and address of all owners, lessors, lessees, security interest holders, and lienholders of such vessel. If a person removing or storing the vessel has knowledge of facts which reasonably indicate that the vessel is registered or titled in a certain other state, such person shall check the vessel records of that other state in the attempt to ascertain the identity of the owner of the vessel.

(e.1) (1) (A)

Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in subsection (e) of this Code section, then the commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license required by this title or Title 27 which is held by or has been applied for by the person, until all fees connected with removal and storage of the vessel have been paid and any lien acquired under Code Section 52-7-73 for such fees has been satisfied. The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the certificate of number or license, or both. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.

Upon ascertaining the owner of such vessel, the person removing or storing such vessel shall, within five calendar days, by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery, notify the owner, lessors, lessees, security interest holders, and lienholders of the vessel of the location of such vessel and of the fact that such vessel is deemed abandoned and shall be disposed of if not redeemed.

If the identity of the owner of such vessel cannot be ascertained, the person removing or storing such vessel shall place an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such vessel was obtained or, if there is no newspaper in such county, shall post such advertisement at the county courthouse in such place where other public notices are posted. Such advertisement shall run in the newspaper once a week for two consecutive weeks or shall remain posted at the courthouse for two consecutive weeks. The advertisement shall contain a complete description of the vessel, its certificate of number and hull identification number, the location from where such vessel was initially removed, the present location of such vessel, and the fact that such vessel is deemed abandoned and shall be disposed of if not redeemed.

Reserved.

Any person storing a vessel under the provisions of this Code section shall notify the Department of Natural Resources if the vessel is recovered, is claimed by the owner, is determined to be stolen, or is for any reason no longer an abandoned vessel. Such notice shall be provided within seven calendar days of such event.

If vessel information on the abandoned vessel is not in the files of the Department of Natural Resources, the department may require such other information or confirmation as it determines is necessary or appropriate to determine the identity of the vessel.

Any person who does not provide the notice and information required by this Code section shall not be entitled to any storage fees.

Any person who knowingly provides false or misleading information when providing any notice or information as required by this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor.

(B)

Any person whose vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the commissioner as defendant and must be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or acts of the department.

(2) (A)

Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in subsection (e) of this Code section and delivery of a copy of such notice to the state revenue commissioner, then the state revenue commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any motor vehicle registration required by Title 40 which is held by or has been applied for by the person, until all fees connected with removal and storage of the vessel have been paid and any lien acquired under Code Section 52-7-73 for such fees has been satisfied. The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the registration. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.

(B)

Any person whose motor vehicle registration is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the state revenue commissioner as defendant and must be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or acts of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 4; Ga. L. 2007, p. 105, § 2/HB 132; Ga. L. 2020, p. 479, § 1/SB 308; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 52/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation,” in the first sentence of subsection (e) and near the beginning of subsection (i); and deleted subsection (h), which read: “Information forwarded to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation as required by this Code section shall be placed by the bureau on the National Crime Information Center Network.”

The 2021 amendment,

effect May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, designated subsection (h), which was repealed, as reserved.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

52-7-72.
Authority of peace officer to cause removal of unattended vessels; notifications; duties.

Any peace officer who finds a vessel which has been left unattended in or upon any public waters or other public property for a period of at least five days, if such peace officer reasonably believes that the person who left such vessel unattended does not intend to return and remove such vessel, shall notify the Department of Natural Resources of such finding in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section and may cause such vessel to be removed to a garage or other place of safety.

Any peace officer who finds a vessel which has been left unattended in or upon any public waters or other public property, when such vessel poses a threat to public health or safety, shall notify the Department of Natural Resources of such finding in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section and may immediately cause such vessel to be removed to a garage or other place of safety.

Any peace officer who, under the provisions of this Code section, causes any vessel to be removed to a garage or other place of safety shall be liable for gross negligence only.

Any peace officer who finds a vessel under such conditions as described in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall within 72 hours from the time of such finding:

Notify the Department of Natural Resources of the description of the vessel, whether the vessel has been removed or not, and, if removed, the location to which such vessel has been removed; and

If available on the Georgia Crime Information Center Network, determine the name and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel.

If vessel information is not in the files of the Department of Natural Resources, the department may require such other information or confirmation as it determines is necessary or appropriate to determine the identity of the vessel.

If any such vessel is determined to be a stolen vessel, the local law enforcement officer or agency shall notify the Georgia Crime Information Center and the owner, if known, of the location of such vessel within 72 hours after receiving notice that such vessel is a stolen vessel.

If the vessel is removed and the name and address of the last known registered owner of the vessel is obtained from the Georgia Crime Information Center, the peace officer who causes the vessel to be removed shall, within three calendar days of removal, make available to the person removing such vessel the name and address of the last known registered owner of such vessel. If such information is not available, the peace officer shall, within three calendar days of removal, notify the person removing or storing such vessel of such fact.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 105, § 3/HB 132; Ga. L. 2020, p. 479, § 2/SB 308.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “and the Georgia Crime Information Center” in subparagraph (d)(1)(A).

52-7-72.1.
Penalty for failing to remove unattended vessel.

If any vessel for which the Department of Natural Resources and the Georgia Crime Information Center have received notice pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72 has not been removed and is determined not to be a stolen vessel, the commissioner may proceed to take action against the owner as provided by this Code section.

If any vessel for which the Department of Natural Resources and the Georgia Crime Information Center have received notice pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72 has been removed, the provisions of this Code section shall not apply and the provisions of Code Section 52-7-71 shall apply instead.

Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72, then the commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license required by this title or Title 27 which is held by or has been applied for by a person who owns the vessel, until the owner restores and resumes operation of the vessel or removes it from public waters or public property. The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the certificate of number or license, or both. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.

Any person whose vessel certificate of number or commercial fishing boat license is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the commissioner as defendant and must be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or acts of the department.

Upon notice to the Department of Natural Resources as described in subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-72 and delivery of a copy of such notice to the state revenue commissioner, then the state revenue commissioner may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any motor vehicle registration required by Title 40 which is held by or has been applied for by a person who owns the vessel, until the owner restores and resumes operation of the vessel or removes it from public waters or public property. The person shall be notified of the proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the registration. The proposed order for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this paragraph.

Any person whose motor vehicle registration is proposed for revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal under this paragraph shall have the right to enter an appeal in the superior court of the county of his or her residence or in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Such appeal shall name the state revenue commissioner as defendant and must be filed within 30 days from the date the notice of the proposed order was sent. The person filing the appeal shall neither be required to post any bond nor to pay the costs in advance. If the person so desires, the appeal may be heard by the judge at term or in chambers or by a jury at the first term. The hearing on the appeal shall be de novo, but no appeal shall act as a supersedeas of any orders or acts of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-72.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 105, § 4/HB 132.

52-7-73.
Lien on vessel; foreclosure in courts competent to hear civil cases.

Any person who removes or stores any vessel which is or becomes an abandoned vessel shall have a lien on such vessel for the reasonable fees connected with such removal or storage plus the cost of any advertisement. Prior to acquiring such lien, the person must have complied with the requirements of Code Section 52-7-71.

The lien acquired under subsection (a) of this Code section may be foreclosed in any court which is competent to hear civil cases, including, but not limited to, magistrate courts. Liens shall be foreclosed in magistrate courts only when the amount of the lien does not exceed the jurisdictional limits established by law for such courts.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1.

52-7-74.
Procedure for foreclosure.

All liens acquired under Code Section 52-7-73 shall be foreclosed as follows:

Any proceeding to foreclose a lien on an abandoned vessel must be instituted within one year from the time the lien is recorded or is asserted by retention;

The person desiring to foreclose a lien on an abandoned vessel shall, by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery, make a demand upon the owner for the payment of the reasonable fees for removal and storage plus the costs of any advertisement. Such written demand shall include an itemized statement of all charges. No such written demand shall be required if the identity of the owner cannot be ascertained and the notice requirements of subsection (g) of Code Section 52-7-71 have been complied with;

If, within ten days of delivery to the appropriate address of the written demand required by paragraph (2) of this Code section, the owner of the abandoned vessel fails to respond to such demand or refuses to pay, or if the owner of the abandoned vessel cannot be ascertained, the person removing or storing the abandoned vessel may foreclose such lien. The person asserting such lien may move to foreclose by making an affidavit to a court of competent jurisdiction showing all facts necessary to constitute such lien and the amount claimed to be due. Such affidavit shall aver that the notice requirements of Code Section 52-7-71 have been complied with, and such affidavit shall also aver that a demand for payment has been made and refused or that the identity of the owner cannot be ascertained. The person foreclosing shall verify the statement by oath or affirmation and shall affix his signature thereto.

Regardless of the court in which the affidavit required by this paragraph is filed, the fee for filing such affidavit shall be $5.00 per vessel upon which a lien is asserted;

Upon such affidavit’s being filed, the lien claimant shall give the clerk or judge of the court the address, if known, of the owner, lessor, lessee, security interest holders, and lienholders of the abandoned vessel. The clerk or judge of the court shall serve notice upon such owner, lessor, lessee, security interest holders, and lienholders of the abandoned vessel of a right to a hearing to determine if reasonable cause exists to believe that a valid debt exists; that such hearing must be petitioned for within ten days after receipt of such notice; and that, if no petition for such hearing is filed within the time allowed, the lien will conclusively be deemed a valid one and foreclosure thereof allowed.

Any notice required by this paragraph shall be by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery or, if the owner, lessor, lessee, security interest holder, or lienholder is unknown, by posting such notice at the county courthouse in such place where other public notices are posted;

If a petition for a probable cause hearing is filed within the time allowed, the court shall set such a hearing within ten days of filing of the petition. If, at the hearing, the court determines that reasonable cause exists to believe that a valid debt exists, then the person asserting the lien shall retain possession of the vessel or the court shall obtain possession of the vessel, as ordered by the court. The owner-debtor may obtain possession of the vessel by giving bond and security in the amount determined to be probably due and costs of the action;

Within five days of the probable cause hearing, a party defendant must petition the court for a full hearing on the validity of the debt if a further determination of the validity of the debt is desired. If no such petition is filed, the lien for the amount determined reasonably due shall conclusively be deemed a valid one and foreclosure thereof allowed. If such a petition is filed, the court shall set a full hearing thereon within 15 days of the filing of the petition. Upon the filing of such petition by a party defendant, neither the prosecuting lienholder nor the court may sell the vessel, although possession of the vessel may be retained;

If, after a full hearing, the court finds that a valid debt exists, then the court shall authorize foreclosure upon and sale of the vessel subject to the lien to satisfy the debt if such debt is not otherwise immediately paid;

If the court finds the actions of the person asserting the lien in retaining possession of the vessel were not taken in good faith, then the court, in its discretion, may award damages to the owner, any party which has been deprived of the rightful use of the vessel, or the lessee due to the deprivation of the use of the vessel; and

If no petition for a hearing is filed, or if, after a full hearing, the court determines that a valid debt exists, the court shall issue an order authorizing the sale of such vessel. However, the holder of a security interest in or a lien on the vessel, other than the holder of a lien created by Code Section 52-7-73, shall have the right, in the order of priority of such security interest or lien, to pay the debt and court costs. If the holder of a security interest or lien does so pay the debt and court costs, such person shall have the right to possession of the vessel, and that person’s security interest in or lien on such vessel shall be increased by the amount so paid. A court order shall be issued to this effect, and in this instance there shall not be a sale of the vessel.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, §§ 3, 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

52-7-75.
Public sale of vessel; disposition of excess proceeds.

As used in this subsection, the term “public sale” means a sale:

Held at a place reasonably available to persons who might desire to attend and submit bids;

At which those attending shall be given the opportunity to bid on a competitive basis;

At which the sale, if made, shall be made to the highest and best bidder; and

Except as otherwise provided in Title 11 for advertising or dispensing with the advertising of public sales, of which notice is given by advertisement once a week for two weeks in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county where the sale is to be held, and which notice shall state the day and hour, between 9:00 A.M. and 5:00 P.M., and the place of sale and shall briefly identify the goods to be sold.

Upon order of the court, the person holding the lien on the abandoned vessel shall be authorized to sell such vessel at public sale.

After satisfaction of the lien, the person selling such vessel shall turn the remaining proceeds of such sale, if any, over to the clerk of the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3C-6/SB 65.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 1-1/SB 65, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Debtor-Creditor Uniform Law Modernization Act of 2015.’

“(b)
To promote consistency among the states, it is the intent of the General Assembly to modernize certain existing uniform laws promulgated by the Uniform Law Commission affecting debtor and creditor rights, responsibilities, and relationships and other federally recognized laws affecting such rights, responsibilities, and relationships.”

52-7-76.
Issuance of certificate of title.

The purchaser at a sale as authorized in this article shall receive a certified copy of the court order authorizing such sale. Any such purchaser may obtain a certificate of title to such vessel by filing the required application, paying the required fees, and filing a certified copy of the order of the court with the Department of Natural Resources. The Department of Natural Resources shall then issue a certificate of title, which shall be free and clear of all liens and encumbrances.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1.

52-7-77.
Payment of balance remaining after satisfaction of liens, security interests, and debts.

The clerk of the court shall retain the remaining balance of the proceeds of a sale conducted under Code Section 52-7-75, after satisfaction of liens, security interests, and debts, for a period of 12 months; and, if no claim has been filed against such proceeds by the owner of the abandoned vessel or any interested party, then he shall pay such remaining balance as follows:

If the abandoned vessel came into the possession of the person creating the lien other than at the request of a peace officer, the proceeds of the sale shall be divided equally and paid into the general fund of the county in which the sale was made and into the general fund of the municipality, if any, in which the sale was made;

If the abandoned vessel came into the possession of the person creating the lien at the request of a police officer of a municipality, the proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the general fund of the municipality;

If the abandoned vessel came into the possession of the person creating the lien at the request of a county sheriff, deputy sheriff, or county police officer, the proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the general fund of the county in which the sale was made; or

If the abandoned vessel came into the possession of the person creating the lien at the request of a member of the Georgia State Patrol or other employee of the State of Georgia, the proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the general fund of the county in which the sale was made.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 613, § 1.